Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.33
Sale and selling, defined.

Sale, selling,
and equivalent expressions mean the attempted act or acts either as principal,
agent, or salesperson or in any capacity whatsoever of selling, bartering,
exchanging, or otherwise disposing of or negotiating or offering or attempting
to negotiate the sale, purchase, or exchange of or interest in any motor vehicle,
trailer, or motorcycle, including the leasing of any motor vehicle, trailer,
or motorcycle for a period of thirty or more days with a right or option to
purchase under the terms of the lease.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 45.